Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Chapter 21. General Provisions.
Sec. 04.21.065.
Posting of warning signs.

A holder of one of the following types of licenses or permits shall post on the licensed or designated premises three separate warning signs as described in (b) of this section:

brewery manufacturer license under AS

04.09.020

with a manufacturer sampling endorsement under AS

04.09.410

;

winery manufacturer license under AS

04.09.030

with a manufacturer sampling endorsement under AS

04.09.410

;

distillery manufacturer license under AS

04.09.040

with a manufacturer sampling endorsement under AS 04.09.410;

beverage dispensary license under AS

04.09.200

;

restaurant or eating place license under AS

04.09.210

;

club license under AS

04.09.220

;

package store license under AS

04.09.230

;

pub license under AS

04.09.240

;

theater license under AS

04.09.250

;

common carrier dispensary license under AS

04.09.260

;

sporting activity or event license under AS

04.09.270

;

outdoor recreation lodge license under AS

04.09.280

;

fair license under AS

04.09.290

;

golf course license under AS

04.09.300

;

destination resort license under AS

04.09.310

;

brewery retail license under AS

04.09.320

;

winery retail license under AS

04.09.330

;

distillery retail license under AS

04.09.340

;

beverage dispensary tourism license under AS

04.09.350

;

seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license under AS

04.09.360

;

beverage dispensary caterer’s permit under AS

04.09.610

;

restaurant caterer’s dining permit under AS

04.09.620

;

club caterer’s permit under AS

04.09.630

;

art exhibit event permit under AS

04.09.640

;

music festival permit under AS

04.09.645

;

nonprofit organization event permit under AS

04.09.650

;

package store tasting event permit under AS

04.09.670

;

conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

;

another license or permit issued by the board authorizing consumption of alcoholic beverages.

The warning signs required by (a) of this section must be at least 11 inches by 14 inches, and the lettering must be at least one-half inch high and in contrasting colors. The first sign must read, “WARNING: Drinking alcoholic beverages such as beer, wine, wine coolers, and distilled spirits or smoking cigarettes during pregnancy can cause birth defects.” The second sign must read, “WARNING: A person who provides alcoholic beverages to a person under 21 years of age, if convicted under AS

04.16.051

, could be imprisoned for up to five years and fined up to $50,000.” The third sign must read, “WARNING: An unaccompanied person under 21 years of age who enters these premises in violation of law may, under AS

04.16.049(e)

, be civilly liable for damages of $1,500.” The license or permit holder shall display the first and second signs in a manner that would make them conspicuous to a person who will be purchasing or consuming alcoholic beverages or smoking cigarettes on the licensed or designated premises and shall conspicuously display the third sign at each door through which customers enter the licensed premises.

The board shall furnish a sign required under this section to a person who requests it with the intention of displaying it.

A peace officer may issue a citation for a violation of this section. The provisions of AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

apply to the issuance of a citation under this subsection.

An employee of the board designated by the board to enforce this section may issue a citation for a violation of this section regardless of whether the violation was committed in the employee’s presence. A citation issued under this subsection must be in the same form and shall be processed in the same manner as a citation issued by a peace officer under (d) of this section. An employee of the board may not arrest a person for a violation of this section.

A holder of a license or permit who violates this section is guilty of a violation as defined in AS

11.81.900(b)

and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $20 nor more than $300. Each day a violation continues after a citation for the violation has been issued constitutes a separate violation.

The supreme court shall establish a schedule of bail amounts for violations of this section. The bail amount may not exceed the maximum fine that may be imposed for the violation under (f) of this section. The bail amount for a violation must appear on the citation.

If a person cited for a violation under this section does not contest the citation, the person may, on or before the 30th day after the date of the citation, mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court in which the citation is filed

the amount of bail indicated on the citation for the violation; and

a copy of the citation indicating that the right to an appearance is waived, a plea of no contest is entered, and the bail is forfeited.

When bail has been forfeited under (h) of this section, a judgment of conviction shall be entered. Forfeiture of bail is a complete satisfaction for the violation. The clerk of the court accepting the bail shall provide the violator with a receipt stating that fact if requested.

A person cited under this section is guilty of failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230

if the person fails to pay the bail amount established under (g) of this section or to appear in court as required.

The board or any affected party may institute an action in the superior court to enjoin repeated violations of this section.

Notwithstanding AS

04.11.370

, the board is not required to suspend or revoke a license or permit for a violation of this section; however, the board may consider a violation of this section when determining under AS

04.11.370

(a)(2) whether continuation of activities authorized under a license or permit would be in the best interests of the public.

History.

[§ 2 ch 81 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1991; am §§ 3, 4 ch 46 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 1995; am § 56 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 2, 3 ch 87 SLA 2001; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 29 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 2014; am § 10 ch 32 SLA 2016; Repealed, § 144 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.21.070.
Enforcement.

Peace officers shall investigate and report to the board violations of this title.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.21.078.
Court records of persons under 21 years of age.

The Alaska Court System may not publish on a publicly available website the court records of a violation of AS

04.16.049

or

04.16.050

, or a similar ordinance of a municipality, if the violation was charged separately and was not joined with any other minor offense or criminal charge at the time of filing.

History.

(§ 11 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 11, ch. 32, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on October 4, 2016.

Sec. 04.21.078.
Court records of persons under 21 years of age.

The Alaska Court System may not publish on a publicly available website the court records of a violation of AS

04.16.049

,

04.16.050

, 04.16.060(g), or a similar ordinance of a municipality, if the violation was charged separately and was not joined with any other minor offense or criminal charge at the time of filing.

History.

(§ 11 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 146 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.21.080.
Definitions.

In this title,

a person acts with “criminal negligence” with respect to a result or to a circumstance described by a provision of law defining an offense when the person fails to perceive a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the result will occur or that the circumstance exists; the risk must be of such a nature and degree that the failure to perceive it constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person would observe in the situation;

a person acts “knowingly” with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a provision of law defining an offense when the person is aware that the person’s conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists; when knowledge of the existence of a particular fact is an element of an offense, that knowledge is established if a person is aware of a substantial probability of its existence, unless the person actually believes it does not exist; a person who is unaware of conduct or a circumstance of which the person would have been aware had the person not been intoxicated acts knowingly with respect to that conduct or circumstance;

a person acts “recklessly” with respect to a result or to a circumstance described by a provision of law defining an offense when the person is aware of and consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the result will occur or that the circumstance exists; the risk must be of such a nature and degree that disregard of it constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would observe in the situation; a person who is unaware of a risk of which the person would have been aware had the person not been intoxicated acts recklessly with respect to that risk.

In this title,

“alcoholic beverage” means a spirituous, vinous, malt, or other fermented or distilled liquid, whatever the origin, that is intended for human consumption as a beverage and that contains one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume, whether produced commercially or privately; however, in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

, “alcoholic beverage” means a spirituous, vinous, malt, or other fermented or distilled liquid, whatever the origin, that is intended for human consumption as a beverage by the person who possesses or attempts to possess it and that contains alcohol in any amount if the liquid is produced privately, or that contains one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume, if the liquid is produced commercially;

“board” means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;

“bottling” means to put into a bottle, can, or other container;

“community diversion panel” means a youth court or other group serving as a sentencing option for a person convicted under this title;

“community work” means and is limited to work on projects designed to reduce or eliminate environmental damage, protect the public health, or improve public land, forests, parks, roads, highways, facilities, or education; community work may not confer a private benefit on a person except as may be incidental to the public benefit;

“designated premises” means any or all designated portions of a building or structure, rooms or enclosures in the building or structure, or real estate leased, used, controlled, or operated by a licensee for the purpose for which the permit is issued by the board at the location of the site for which the permit is issued;

“director” means the director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;

“distributing point” means a location where alcoholic beverages are distributed from a warehouse;

“drunken person” means a person whose physical or mental conduct is substantially impaired as a result of the introduction of an alcoholic beverage into the person’s body and who exhibits those plain and easily observed or discovered outward manifestations of behavior commonly known to be produced by the overconsumption of alcoholic beverages;

“established village” means an area that does not contain any part of an incorporated city or another established village and that is

an unincorporated community that is in the unorganized borough and that has 25 or more permanent residents; or

an unincorporated community that is in an organized borough, has 25 or more permanent residents, and

is on a road system and is located more than 50 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality, or

is not on a road system and is located more than 15 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality;

“foreign limited liability company” has the meaning given in AS

10.50.990

;

“foreign limited liability partnership” has the meaning given in AS 32.06;

“half-keg” means a keg designed to be a bulk container for, and containing not more than, 15 1/2 gallons of malt beverages;

“juvenile alcohol safety action program” means

a juvenile alcohol safety action program developed and implemented or approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37;

any other alcohol education or treatment program approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37 if a program described in (A) of this paragraph is not available in the community in which the person resides; or

a program or counseling approved by the court if a program or treatment described in (A) of this paragraph is not available in the community where the person resides;

“licensed premises” means any or all designated portions of a building or structure, rooms or enclosures in the building or structure, or real estate leased, used, controlled, or operated by a licensee in the conduct of business for which the licensee is licensed by the board at the specific address for which the license is issued;

“limited liability company” means an organization under AS 10.50;

“limited liability organization” means a limited liability company, a foreign limited liability company, a limited liability partnership, or a foreign limited liability partnership;

“limited liability partnership” has the meaning given in AS 32.06;

“local governing body” means, as appropriate, a city council, a borough assembly, or a traditional village council, but does not include a corporation established under the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act;

“manufacture” means the creation of alcoholic content by use of fermentation with natural or artificial sugar or yeast or distillation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1983; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 10, 11 ch 80 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 203 SLA 1990; am §§ 57, 58 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 17 ch 74 SLA 1999; am §§ 2, 3 ch 115 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 17 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 86 SLA 2010; am § 8 ch 88 SLA 2010; am § 12 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

The paragraphs in subsection (b) were renumbered in 1986, 1999, 2010, and 2016 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (b), added (20) [now (4)].

Sec. 04.21.080.
Definitions.

In this title,

a person acts with “criminal negligence” with respect to a result or to a circumstance described by a provision of law defining an offense when the person fails to perceive a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the result will occur or that the circumstance exists; the risk must be of such a nature and degree that the failure to perceive it constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person would observe in the situation;

a person acts “knowingly” with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a provision of law defining an offense when the person is aware that the person’s conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists; when knowledge of the existence of a particular fact is an element of an offense, that knowledge is established if a person is aware of a substantial probability of its existence, unless the person actually believes it does not exist; a person who is unaware of conduct or a circumstance of which the person would have been aware had the person not been intoxicated acts knowingly with respect to that conduct or circumstance;

a person acts “recklessly” with respect to a result or to a circumstance described by a provision of law defining an offense when the person is aware of and consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the result will occur or that the circumstance exists; the risk must be of such a nature and degree that disregard of it constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of conduct that a reasonable person would observe in the situation; a person who is unaware of a risk of which the person would have been aware had the person not been intoxicated acts recklessly with respect to that risk.

In this title,

“alcoholic beverage” means a spirituous, vinous, malt, or other fermented or distilled liquid, whatever the origin, that is intended for human consumption as a beverage and that contains one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume, whether produced commercially or privately; however, in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

, “alcoholic beverage” means a spirituous, vinous, malt, or other fermented or distilled liquid, whatever the origin, that is intended for human consumption as a beverage by the person who possesses or attempts to possess it and that contains alcohol in any amount if the liquid is produced privately, or that contains one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume, if the liquid is produced commercially;

“board” means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;

[Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

“community diversion panel” means a youth court or other group serving as a sentencing option for a person convicted under this title;

“community work” means and is limited to work on projects designed to reduce or eliminate environmental damage, protect the public health, or improve public land, forests, parks, roads, highways, facilities, or education; community work may not confer a private benefit on a person except as may be incidental to the public benefit;

“designated premises” means any or all designated portions of a building or structure, rooms or enclosures in the building or structure, or real estate leased, used, controlled, or operated by a licensee or permittee for the purpose for which the license or permit is issued by the board at the location of the site for which the license or permit is issued;

“director” means the director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;

“distributing point” means a location where alcoholic beverages are distributed from a warehouse;

“drunken person” means a person whose physical or mental conduct is substantially impaired as a result of the introduction of an alcoholic beverage into the person’s body and who exhibits those plain and easily observed or discovered outward manifestations of behavior commonly known to be produced by the overconsumption of alcoholic beverages;

“established village” means an area that does not contain any part of an incorporated city or another established village and that is

an unincorporated community that is in the unorganized borough and that has 25 or more permanent residents; or

an unincorporated community that is in an organized borough, has 25 or more permanent residents, and

is on a road system and is located more than 50 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality, or

is not on a road system and is located more than 15 miles outside the boundary limits of a unified municipality;

“foreign limited liability company” has the meaning given in AS

10.50.990

;

“foreign limited liability partnership” has the meaning given in AS 32.06;

“half-keg” means a keg designed to be a bulk container for, and containing not more than, 15 1/2 gallons of malt beverages;

“juvenile alcohol safety action program” means

a juvenile alcohol safety action program developed and implemented or approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37;

any other alcohol education or treatment program approved by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.37 if a program described in (A) of this paragraph is not available in the community in which the person resides; or

a program or counseling approved by the court if a program or treatment described in (A) of this paragraph is not available in the community where the person resides;

“licensed premises” means any or all designated portions of a building or structure, rooms or enclosures in the building or structure, or real estate leased, used, controlled, or operated by a licensee in the conduct of business for which the licensee is licensed by the board at the specific address for which the license or an endorsement to the license is issued;

“limited liability company” means an organization under AS 10.50;

“limited liability organization” means a limited liability company, a foreign limited liability company, a limited liability partnership, or a foreign limited liability partnership;

“limited liability partnership” has the meaning given in AS 32.06;

“local governing body” means, as appropriate, a city council, a borough assembly, or a traditional village council, but does not include a corporation established under the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act;

“manufacture” means the creation of alcoholic content by use of fermentation with natural or artificial sugar or yeast or distillation.

“bona fide restaurant” means an establishment or a portion of an establishment where, during all times alcoholic beverages are served or consumed,

the patron’s principal activity is consumption of food; and

a variety of types of food items appropriate for meals is prepared on site and available for sale as shown on a menu provided to patrons and filed with the board;

“brewed beverage” means an alcoholic beverage made by fermenting cereal grains, including beer and malt beverages, sake, and kombucha;

“calendar year” means the period beginning January 1 and ending December 31;

“cider” means a type of wine made primarily from fermented apples, apple juice, or concentrate;

“distilled spirit” means an alcoholic beverage that is first fermented and then distilled;

“golf course” means a course that is open to the public, having at least nine holes, and covering at least 2,950 yards;

“kombucha” means a brewed beverage made from fermented tea and containing at least one-half percent alcohol by volume;

“mead” means a type of wine made primarily from honey;

“sake” means a type of brewed beverage made primarily from fermented rice;

“wine” means an alcoholic beverage made from fermented grapes or other fruit or honey.

History.

(§ 4 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1983; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 10, 11 ch 80 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 203 SLA 1990; am §§ 57, 58 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 17 ch 74 SLA 1999; am §§ 2, 3 ch 115 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 17 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 86 SLA 2010; am § 8 ch 88 SLA 2010; am § 12 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 147 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 148 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 149 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022)